Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1188.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2517.03, to read: START_STATUTE36-2517.03. United States food and drug administration; approved medications; scheduling; prescription authority Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, without any further action by the board: 1. Any compound, mixture or preparation that is approved by the United States food and drug administration and that is scheduled or rescheduled by the United States drug enforcement administration is assigned the identical schedule under this chapter. 2. Any compound, mixture or preparation that is approved by the United States food and drug administration and that is scheduled or rescheduled by the United States drug enforcement administration to a schedule other than schedule I of the controlled substances act (P.L. 91-513; 84 Stat. 1242; 21 United States Code sections 801 through 904) is A controlled substance for the purposes of this chapter and may be prescribed in this state. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.